Washington statutes.
RCW 18.250.040

License required.

(1) It is unlawful for any person to practice or offer to practice as an athletic trainer, or to represent themselves or other persons to be legally able to provide services as an athletic trainer, unless the person is licensed under the provisions of this chapter.

(2) No person may use the title "athletic trainer," the letters "ATC" or "LAT," the terms "sports trainer," "team trainer," "trainer," or any other words, abbreviations, or insignia in connection with his or her name to indicate or imply, directly or indirectly, that he or she is an athletic trainer without being licensed in accordance with this chapter as an athletic trainer.

[ 2019 c 358 s 1; 2007 c 253 s 5.]